California statutes. Water Code
“Shall the proposition to organize ____ Water Replenishment District under the Water Replenishment District Act be adopted?”

The candidates shall declare their candidacy and shall be nominated, the election shall be held and conducted, the vote canvassed, the result declared and the certificate of election issued in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code, so far as they may be applicable, except as in this act otherwise provided. No person shall be entitled to vote at any election under the provisions of this act unless such person possesses all of the qualifications required of voters under the Elections Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60122.

Within seven (7) days after such election the vote shall be canvassed by said board of supervisors of the principal county. If a majority of the votes cast in such election shall be in favor of organizing such district, said board shall, by order, entered on its minutes, declare the territory included within the proposed boundaries duly organized, as a water replenishment district under the name theretofore designated, and the county clerk of the principal county shall immediately cause to be recorded in the offices of the county recorders of each affected county a certificate stating that such proposition was adopted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

60122.5.

The county clerk of the principal county shall immediately cause to be filed with the Secretary of State a certificate listing:

(a) The name of the district.

(b) The date of formation.

(c) The county or counties in which the district is located, and a description of the boundaries of the district, or reference to a map showing such boundaries, which map shall be attached to the certificate, or reference to the county recorder’s office where a description of such boundaries has been recorded.

If the order declaring the district organized contains all of the information required to be in the certificate, the county clerk may file a copy of the order in lieu of the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

60123.

Upon receipt of said certificate or a copy of the order declaring the district organized, the Secretary of State shall, within ten (10) days, issue his certificate reciting that the named water replenishment district has been duly incorporated according to the laws of the State of California. A copy of such certificate shall be transmitted to and filed with the county clerk of each affected county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

60124.

Upon filing said certificate of the county clerk of the principal county, or a copy of the order declaring the district organized, with the Secretary of State, the district shall be deemed incorporated as a water replenishment district, with all the rights, privileges and powers set forth in this act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 457.)
-------------------------------------------

60125.

No informality in any proceeding or informality in the conduct of any election, not substantially affecting adversely the legal rights of any citizen, shall be held to invalidate the incorporation of any district, and any proceedings, wherein the validity of such incorporation is denied, shall be commenced within three (3) months from the date of the certificate of incorporation, otherwise said incorporation and the legal existence of said district and all proceedings in respect thereto shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 3. INTERNAL ORGANIZATION [60130. - 60217.]



  CHAPTER 1. Directors [60130. - 60144.]

60130.

If a majority of the votes cast at such election are in favor of organizing such district, the persons voted for as directors who receive the highest number of votes within the respective divisions shall be duly elected as directors of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60131.

The board of a district organized under this act shall consist of five members, and one director, who shall be a resident of the division, shall be elected by the voters thereof, for each of the five divisions of such district, which divisions shall be numbered first, second, third, fourth and fifth, and shall be established as provided in Section 60110 of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60132.

The board of directors shall, by resolution, adjust the boundaries of any divisions pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 22000) of Division 21 of the Elections Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 435, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

60133.

The members of the first board shall be elected at the time and in the manner provided in Chapter 3 of Part 2 of this act, and their successors shall be elected or chosen at the times and in the manner hereinafter provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60134.

Each director shall hold office for the term of four (4) years from and after the date for his taking of office, as herein provided, and until the election and qualification of his successor, except that the five members of the first board shall classify themselves by lot so that two of them shall hold office until the qualification of, and taking office by, their successors elected at an election held in the next succeeding even-numbered year, and so that three shall hold office until the qualification of, and taking of office by, their successors elected at an election held in the second succeeding even-numbered year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60135.

In the case of all districts (except as to the election of the first board) the elections of directors shall be held at the time of the general election and shall be consolidated therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 7, Sec. 1.5.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

60136.

Each candidate for director who at the election of directors receives votes on a plurality of all the ballots cast for candidates for the office for which he or she seeks election shall be elected to that office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 7, Sec. 2.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

60138.

Candidates shall declare their candidacy and shall be nominated, election returns shall be canvassed, the election shall be held and conducted, the results shall be declared, and the certificates of election shall be issued, in the same manner as the declaration of candidacy, nomination, election, canvassing of returns, declaration of results, and issuance of certificates of election for county officers are made, declared, held, and conducted, and issued, so far as consistent with the provisions of this act and except as otherwise herein expressly provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60139.

Directors elected hereunder, except the first board, shall take office at the same time provided by the Government Code for county officers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60140.

The election of directors held at the time of the general election and consolidated therewith shall be known as the general water replenishment district election, and each other election which may be held by authority of this division or the Elections Code or other law applicable thereto shall be known as a special water replenishment district election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 7, Sec. 4.   Effective February 8, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

60141.

If, on the sixty-fifth day prior to the day fixed for the district general election, only one person has been nominated for each office of member of the board to be filled at that election, said board shall by resolution entered in their minutes order that an election shall not be held, and shall immediately request that the board of supervisors of the principal county, at a regular or special meeting held prior to the day of election, appoint, and the board of supervisors shall thereupon appoint, to the office or offices the person or persons who have been nominated. The person appointed shall qualify and take office and serve exactly as if elected at a district general election.

In such case, the publication provided for in Section 60111 shall, instead of calling an election, state that no election is to be held but that the board of supervisors will appoint those nominated for the positions of directors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60141.1.

Notice that such appointment may be made in the event that only one nomination is made, shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the district, once, not less than seven days and not more than 14 days prior to the final day on which nominations may be made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1961, Ch. 523.)
-------------------------------------------

60143.

Each director shall receive compensation in an amount not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) for each day’s attendance at meetings of the board or for each day’s service rendered as a director by request of the board, not exceeding a total of six days in any calendar month, together with any expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties required or authorized by the board. For purposes of this section, the determination of whether a director’s activities on any specific day are compensable shall be made pursuant to Article 2.3 (commencing with Section 53232) of Chapter 2 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. Reimbursement for these expenses is subject to Sections 53232.2 and 53232.3 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 700, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

60144.

Any vacancy in the board shall be filled pursuant to Section 1780 of the Government Code. The person so chosen shall be a resident of and otherwise qualified to be a director from the division in which the vacancy shall occur.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1059.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Board of Directors [60150. - 60155.]

60150.

The board shall be the governing body of such district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60151.

It shall hold its first meeting as soon as possible after the election and certification of the first board and not later than the sixth Monday after the date of the first election of directors as herein provided; it shall choose one of its members president, and shall thereupon provide for the time and place of holding its meetings and the manner in which its special meetings may be called.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60153.

A majority of the board shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60154.

At its first meeting in the month of January of each odd-numbered year, the board shall choose one of its members president.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60155.

The board shall designate a depository or depositories to have the custody of the funds of the district, all of which depositories shall give security sufficient to secure the district against possible loss, and who shall pay the warrants drawn by the treasurer for demands against the district under such rules as the directors may prescribe.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Board Action [60160. - 60167.]

60160.

The board shall act only by ordinance, resolution, or motion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60161.

On all ordinances the roll shall be called and the ayes and noes recorded in the journal of the proceedings of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60162.

Resolutions and motions may be adopted by voice vote, but on demand of any member the roll shall be called.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60163.

No ordinance, motion or resolution shall be passed or become effective without the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60164.

The enacting clause of all ordinances passed by the board shall be: “Be it ordained by the Board of Directors of _______ Water Replenishment District as follows:”.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60165.

Ordinances may be passed by the voters of any district organized under the provisions of this act in accordance with the methods provided by the Elections Code for direct legislation in cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60166.

Ordinances may be disapproved and thereby vetoed by the voters of any such district by proceeding in accordance with the methods provided by the Elections Code for protesting against legislation in cities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60167.

(a) In addition to the prohibitions set forth in the Political Reform Act of 1974 (Title 9 (commencing with Section 81000) of the Government Code), a board member of a district may not make, or in any way attempt to use his or her official position to influence, a decision in which the board member knows, or has reason to know that any of the board member’s relatives or cohabitants, whose interests are not otherwise regulated by that act, has a financial interest.

(b) As used in this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Relative” means any person related to the board member by blood or adoption, including all relatives whose status is preceded by the words “step,” “great,” or “grand,” or the spouse of any of these persons, even if the marriage was terminated by death or dissolution.

(2) “Cohabitant” means any person who regularly resides in the board member’s household or who uses the board member’s residence address to receive mail.

(History: Added by Stats. 2001, Ch. 829, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Officers and Employees [60180. - 60187.]

60180.

At its first meeting, or as soon thereafter as practicable, the board shall appoint by a majority vote a secretary, treasurer, attorney, general manager and auditor, define their duties and fix their compensation, and each shall serve at the pleasure of the board, and may employ such additional assistants and employees as they may deem necessary to efficiently maintain and operate said district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60181.

Said board may consolidate the office of secretary and treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60182.

The president and secretary in addition to the respective duties imposed on them by law shall perform such duties as may be imposed on them by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60183.

The treasurer, or such other person or persons as may be authorized by the board, shall draw checks or warrants to pay demands when such demands shall have been audited and approved in the manner prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60184.

The general manager shall have full charge and control of the maintenance, operation and construction of the spreading or other works of the district with full power and authority to employ and discharge all employees and assistants at pleasure, prescribe their duties, fix their compensation, subject to the approval of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60185.

The general manager shall perform such other duties as may be imposed on him by the board. The general manager shall report to the board in accordance with such rules and regulations as they may direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60186.

The attorney shall be the legal adviser of the district and shall perform such other duties as may be prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60187.

The general manager, secretary and treasurer, and all other employees or assistants of said district who may be required to do so by the board, shall give such bonds to the district conditioned for the faithful performance of their duties as the board from time to time may provide. The premiums on such bonds shall be paid by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Conduct of Elections [60210. - 60217.]

60210.

The provisions of the Elections Code so far as they may be applicable shall govern all general district elections and all special district elections, except as in this act otherwise provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60211.

No person shall vote at any district election held under the provisions of this act who is not a voter within the meaning of the Elections Code, residing in the division of the district in which he or she casts his or her vote. For the purpose of registering voters who shall be entitled to vote at district elections, the county elections official is authorized, in any county in which there is a district, to indicate upon the affidavit of registration whether the voter is a voter of a district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 183.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60212.

In case the boundary line of a district crosses the boundary line of a county election precinct only those voters within the district and within the precinct who are registered as being voters within the district shall be permitted to vote, and for that purpose the county elections official may provide two sets of ballots within those precincts, one containing the names of candidates for office in the district, and the other not containing those names, and it shall be the duty of the election officers in those precincts to furnish only those persons registered as voters within the district with the ballots upon which are printed the names of the candidates for office in the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 184.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60213.

In counties in which districts are located the county elections official is hereby given authority, and is authorized to have printed upon the official ballots provided for voters at elections for directors a heading in the same form as that provided by the Elections Code for nonpartisan officers, which heading shall be marked “Water Replenishment District,” with a subheading “For a Member of the Board of Directors, Division ____ (here inserting the number of the division)—Vote for One,” and beneath which shall appear the names of the candidates for the office of member of the board for the division of the district, with the appropriate blank space for the writing in of the name of a candidate if desired by the voters, and with a voting square placed opposite the space. The ballots thus provided shall be furnished by the precinct officers only to those voters within their respective precincts who shall appear on the register as duly registered voters within that division of the district, and in precincts that lie partly within that district and partly without the precinct board shall be supplied with two kinds of ballots by the county elections official, one of which shall contain the matters hereinabove set forth for the use of voters of the district, and the other of which shall be without the heading containing the names of candidates for the office of member of the board, and which shall be furnished to those voters who are not voters of the district and who are voters of the precinct.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 221, Sec. 185.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

60214.

The board shall call and canvass all elections involving matters of initiative and referendum and shall call all other elections which it is authorized to canvass.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60215.

The governing body calling or conducting any election under the provisions of this act shall fix the compensation to be paid the officers of the election and shall designate the precincts and polling places for each division of the district and shall appoint the officers of such election, who shall consist of one inspector, one judge, and two clerks, unless, in case of consolidated elections, other officers of election are required by law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60216.

The voting precincts for any such election may be established and the boundaries thereof fixed and described by such governing body, or such voting precincts may consist of either the regular election precincts or portions thereof within the district established for holding state or county elections, or a consolidation of any or all of such regular election precincts or portions thereof last established.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60217.

If any district election is consolidated with any state or county election, then the voting precincts, polling places, and election officers for the district election shall be the same as those established for such state or county election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. POWERS [60220. - 60232.]



  CHAPTER 1. Purposes and Powers [60220. - 60226.]

60220.

A district may do any act necessary to replenish the ground water of said district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60221.

Without being limited to the following enumerations, a district may, among other things but only for the purposes of replenishing the groundwater supplies within the district:

(a) Buy and sell water;

(b) Exchange water;

(c) Distribute water to persons in exchange for ceasing or reducing ground water extractions;

(d) Spread, sink and inject water into the underground;

(e) Store, transport, recapture, recycle, purify, treat or otherwise manage and control water for the beneficial use of persons or property within the district.

(f) Build the necessary works to achieve ground water replenishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 28, Sec. 51.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

60222.

A district may take any action necessary to protect or prevent interference with water, the quality thereof, or water rights of persons or property within the district, subject to the limitations contained in Section 60230.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60223.

For the purposes of replenishing the ground water supplies within the district, a district may do any act in order to put to beneficial use any water under its control or management.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60224.

For the purpose of protecting and preserving the groundwater supplies within the district for beneficial uses, a district may take any action, within the district, including, but not limited to, capital expenditures and legal actions, which in the discretion of the board is necessary or desirable to accomplish any of the following:

(a) Prevent contaminants from entering the groundwater supplies of the district, whether or not the threat is immediate.

(b) Remove contaminants from the groundwater supplies of the district.

(c) Determine the existence, extent, and location of contaminants in, or which may enter, the groundwater supplies of the district.

(d) Determine persons, whether natural persons or public entities, responsible for those contaminants.

(e) Perform or obtain engineering, hydrologic, and scientific studies for any of the foregoing purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 389, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

60225.

A district may take any action outside the district, including, but not limited to, those set forth in Section 60224, provided the board finds both of the following:

(a) The action is reasonably necessary to protect groundwater supplies within the district.

(b) There is a direct, material relationship between the groundwater supply where the action is to be taken and the groundwater supply within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 389, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

60226.

A district may sue and recover the amount of any district expenditures under Section 60224 from the person or persons responsible for the contaminants causing the expenditures. In proceeding under any state or federal law, a district may recover those expenses from responsible persons and governmental insurance funds. In any action the district, if successful, may recover reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs, as determined by the court. The right or power to recover damages shall not be deemed an adequate remedy at law precluding use of injunctive relief under this section or any other provision of this division or any other statute. In any action for injunctive relief relating to contaminants, no bond shall be required of a district as a condition to granting a preliminary injunction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 389, Sec. 4.5.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Powers [60230. - 60232.]

60230.

For the purposes of replenishing the groundwater supplies within the district, a district shall have power:

(a) To have perpetual succession.

(b) To sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided in this division or by law, in all actions and proceedings in all courts and tribunals.

(c) To adopt a seal and alter it at pleasure.

(d) To take by grant, purchase, gift, devise, or lease, to hold, use and enjoy, and to lease, convey or dispose of, real and personal property of every kind, within or without the district, necessary or convenient to the full exercise of its power.

(e) Within or outside of the district to construct, purchase, lease, or otherwise acquire, and to operate and maintain necessary waterworks and other works, machinery and facilities, canals, conduits, waters, water rights, spreading grounds, lands, rights and privileges useful or necessary to replenish the underground water basin within the district, or to augment the common water supplies of the district, including, but not limited to, the exercise of any power under Section 60224.

(f) For the common benefit of the district, to store water in underground water basins or reservoirs within or outside of the district, to appropriate and acquire water and water rights within or outside of the district, to import water into the district, and to conserve water within or outside of the district.

(g) To carry out the purposes of this division, to commence, maintain, intervene in, defend and compromise, in the name of the district, or otherwise, and to assume the costs and expenses of any and all actions and proceedings now or hereafter begun to determine or adjudicate all or a portion of the rights to divert, extract, or use waters within the district, or within any segments thereof or subbasins therein, as between owners of or claimants to those rights, to prevent any interference with water or water rights used or useful to the lands, inhabitants, owners, operators, or producers within the district, or to prevent the diminution of the quantity or quality of the water supply of the district, or to prevent unlawful exportation of water from the district.

(h) To exercise the right of eminent domain to take any property necessary to supply the district or any portion thereof with replenishment water, including, but not limited to, the exercise of any power under Section 60224, except that the right of eminent domain may not be exercised with respect to (1) water and water rights already devoted to beneficial use, and (2) property (other than water and water rights) already appropriated to public use unless the taking be for a more necessary public use than that to which the property is already appropriated; provided that the district in exercising that power shall in addition to the damage for taking, injuring, or destruction of property also pay the cost of removal, reconstruction, or relocation of any structure, including, but not limited to, railways, mains, pipes, conduits, wires, cables, towers, or poles of any public utility which is required to be removed to a new location. No use by a district of property owned, at the time the action to condemn is brought, by an existing agency having powers to provide for the replenishment of groundwater, shall constitute a more necessary public use than the use to which the property is already appropriated.

A district shall not exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire property outside the boundaries of the principal county in which the district is situated unless it first obtains the consent thereto of the board of supervisors of the county in which the property is located.

(i) To act jointly with or cooperate with the United States or any agency thereof, and cooperate and act jointly with the state, or any county or agency thereof, or any political subdivision or district therein, including flood control districts, public and private corporations, and any person, to the end that the purposes and activities of the district may be fully and economically performed.

(j) To cause assessments and charges to be levied as provided in this division to accomplish the purposes of this division and to maintain such reserve funds for the future purchase of water for replenishment purposes as may be authorized to be levied.

(k) To make contracts, employ labor, and do all acts necessary for the full exercise of the foregoing powers.

(l) To carry on technical and other investigations of all kinds, necessary to carry out the provisions of this division, and for this purpose the district shall have the right of access through its authorized representative to all properties within the district.

(m) To borrow money and incur indebtedness and to issue bonds or other evidences of that indebtedness; to refund or retire any indebtedness or lien that may exist against the district or property thereof; to issue warrants to pay the formation expenses of the district, which may bear interest at a rate not exceeding 6 percent a year from the date of issue until funds are available to pay the warrants, and which formation expenses may include fees of attorneys and others employed to conduct the formation proceedings, but shall not include the expenses of holding and conducting the formation election.

(n) To cause taxes to be levied, in the manner provided in this division, for the purpose of paying any obligation of the district, including its formation expenses and any warrants issued therefor.

(o) To fix the rates at which water shall be sold for replenishment purposes, and to establish different rates for different classes of service or conditions of service, provided the rates shall be uniform for like classes and conditions of service.

(p) To fix the terms and conditions of any contract under which producers may agree voluntarily to use replenishment water from a nontributary source in lieu of groundwater, and to that end a district may become a party to the contract and pay from district funds that portion of the cost of the replenishment waters as will encourage the purchase and use of that water in lieu of pumping so long as the persons or property within the district are directly or indirectly benefited by the resulting replenishment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 389, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

60230.5.

All expenditures for construction work, materials, equipment and supplies, and professional services, including, but not limited to, legal, legislative, public affairs, public relations, and engineering services, regardless of price shall be made pursuant to contract. All district contracts shall be in writing in a form prescribed by the general manager and approved by the general counsel. At minimum, each contract shall include the relevant scope of work, duration, and terms of payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 894, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60231.

(a) The powers and duties herein enumerated, except as otherwise expressly provided, shall be exercised and performed by the board of the district. If an existing agency has facilities available and adequate to accomplish any part of the purposes of a district created under this act, the district shall investigate and determine the cost of contracting for the accomplishment of that purpose through that existing agency. Thereupon, the board shall make a finding , by resolution and supported by evidence, whether or not the purpose proposed to be accomplished by the district can be achieved more economically and for the best interests of the area to be benefited by entering into such a contract with an existing agency. If the board finds that such contract is more economical and for the best interests of the area to be benefited, it shall so contract for the accomplishment of said purpose, if such agency so agrees. The purpose of this section is to avoid duplication of similar operations by existing agencies and replenishment districts.

(b) Prior to constructing, leasing, purchasing, or contracting for a capital improvement project, a district shall determine the feasibility of such a project by ordering or preparing and reviewing a cost-benefit analysis based upon reasonable assumptions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 894, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

60232.

Each district has the power generally to perform all acts necessary to carry out fully the provisions of this act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. FINANCES [60240. - 60292.]



  CHAPTER 1. Depositary [60240. - 60240.]

60240.

Any money belonging to a district may be deposited or invested and drawn out as provided in Title 5, Division 2, Part 1, Chapter 4, Article 2 of the Government Code, as now or hereafter amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Water Charge [60245. - 60246.]

60245.

The board shall fix such rate or rates for the sale or exchange of water for replenishment purposes only as will result in revenues which will pay, insofar as practicable, the operating expenses of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60246.

The rate charged shall be uniform for like classes and conditions of service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Taxes [60250. - 60257.]

60250.

To the extent that the revenues resulting from water charges authorized by Section 60245 of this act are inadequate to meet the obligations and expenses therein set out, the board may cause a tax to be levied, as herein provided, sufficient to pay the expenses and charges set out in Section 60245.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60251.

The board shall determine the amounts necessary to be raised by taxation during the fiscal year and shall fix the rate or rates of tax to be levied which will raise the amounts of money required by the district, and within a reasonable time previous to the time when the board of supervisors is required by law to fix its tax rate, the board shall certify to the board of supervisors a statement in writing containing the following: (a) an estimate of the minimum amount of money required to be raised by taxation during the fiscal year for the payment of the principal of and interest on any bonded debt of the district as it becomes due; (b) a statement that the entire district was benefited by incurring the bonded indebtedness; (c) an estimate of the minimum amount of money required to be raised by taxation during the fiscal year for all other purposes of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60252.

The board shall direct that at the time and in the manner required by law for the levying of taxes for county purposes, such board of supervisors shall levy, in addition to such other tax as may be levied by such board of supervisors, at the rate or rates so fixed and determined by the board, a tax upon the real property and improvements thereon, but not on personal property within the district, and it is made the duty of the officer or body having authority to levy taxes within each county to levy the tax so required.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60253.

Taxes for the payment of the interest on or principal of any bonded debt shall be levied on the real property and improvements thereon, but not on personal property within the district, as determined by the board in the resolution declaring the necessity to incur the debt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60254.

Taxes for other purposes of the district shall be levied on all real property and improvements thereon, but not on personal property in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60255.

It shall be the duty of all county officials charged with the duty of collecting taxes to collect the taxes provided for herein in time, form and manner as county taxes are collected, and when collected pay the same to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60256.

All taxes provided for herein shall be a lien on all the real property and improvements thereon, but not on personal property within the district, and their collection may be enforced by the same means as provided for in the enforcement of liens for state and county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1514.)
-------------------------------------------

60257.
